North Carolina, session 2025, HB792.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce to be allocated to the NC Clean Energy Innovation and Research Fund established by
G.S. 143B-437.105, as enacted by Section 2 of this act, for clean energy innovation and research
grants.
SECTION 1.(b) The sum of four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Commerce for the One North Carolina Fund established in Part 2H of Article 10
of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes to provide competitive grants in the manner set forth in
that Part for support of clean energy and energy efficiency innovation, entrepreneurship, and
small business development in the clean energy sector.
SECTION 2. Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2L. Clean Energy Innovation and Research Fund.
"§ 143B-437.105. NC Clean Energy Innovation and Research (CLEIR) Fund and grant
program.
(a) Fund. – The NC Clean Energy Innovation and Research Fund is established as a
special revenue fund in the Department of Commerce, and the Office of Science, Technology
and Innovation in the Department shall be responsible for administering the Fund.
(b) Purposes. – Moneys in the NC Clean Energy Innovation and Research Fund shall be
allocated pursuant to this subsection. The Department of Commerce shall make grants from the
Fund to private businesses with fewer than 100 employees, nonprofit organizations, local
governments, and State agencies to encourage the expansion of small to medium size businesses
with fewer than 100 employees that will help grow a green economy in the State. The NC Clean
Energy Innovation and Research Fund shall be used for clean energy and energy efficiency
innovations and research and for the development of small businesses and encouragement of
entrepreneurship in these areas.
The priority areas are:
(1) To encourage the development and deployment of renewable energy and
energy efficient and environmentally conscious clean technologies and
products in the State. The Department of Commerce may make grants
available to maximize development, production, distribution, retail
*H792-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
infrastructure, deployment, and consumer purchase of such technologies and
products in North Carolina, including grants to enhance related workforce
development.
(2) To encourage the development of the clean energy industry in the State. The
Department of Commerce may make grants available to assist in the
development and growth of a market for environmentally conscious and
energy efficient green building processes.
(3) To attract and leverage private-sector investments and entrepreneurial growth
in renewable energy and energy efficient and environmentally conscious clean
technologies, products, and businesses, including grants to enhance workforce
development in such businesses.
(c) Cap and Matching Funds. – The Department of Commerce, Office of Science,
Technology and Innovation, may set a cap on a grant from the NC Clean Energy Innovation and
Research Fund and may require a private business to provide matching funds for a grant from
the Fund.
(d) Administration and Expenses. – The Department of Commerce may adopt rules
providing for the administration of the Fund. Of the funds appropriated to the Fund, the
Department may use up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or five percent (5%)
annually, whichever is greater, to administer the Fund."
SECTION 3. Funds appropriated by this act that are not spent or encumbered by
June 30, 2027, shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 792-First Edition